South Dakota, session 2026, SB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $425,000 from the general fund to the Department
of Revenue for providing refunds to elderly persons and persons with a disability for real
property tax and sales tax, pursuant to chapters 10-18A and 10-45A. A portion of the
appropriated sum, not exceeding $20,000, may be used by the department for the
administration of this Act.
Section 2. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall approve vouchers and the state
auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 3. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2027, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 4. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.374.18 2 20
An Act to make an appropriation for tax refunds for elderly persons and persons with a
disability, and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 20
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 20 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB20 ENROLLED